Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 3. Liabilities.

§ 56-119.
Contracts, etc., limiting liability invalid.

No contract, receipt, rule, or regulation shall exempt any transportation company from the liability of a common carrier which would exist had no contract been made or entered into and no such contract, receipt, rule, or regulation for exemption from
liability for injury or loss occasioned by the neglect or misconduct of such transportation company as a common carrier shall be valid. The liability referred to in this section shall mean the liability imposed by law upon a common
carrier for any loss, damage, or injury to freight or passengers in its custody and care as a common carrier.

History.
Code 1919, §§ 3926, 3930; 1979, c. 477.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 217 (1980).

For article, “Virginia’s Rule of Non-waiver of Liability for Negligent Acts: Hiett v. Lake Barcroft Community Association, Inc.,” see 2 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 27 (1994).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No.

1-206

Complaint Against Common Carrier — Injury to Passenger; No.

1-218

Answer of Common Carrier — Injury to Passenger; No.

1-506

Complaint by Seller Against Common Carrier — Damage to Goods.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 19, 21, 34, 67; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 46; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 77.

§§ 56-120,
56-121.
Repealed by Acts 1964, c. 219.

§ 56-122.
When railroad, steamship, etc., companies not liable as a common carrier.

Whenever any corporation, company, or association not incorporated by or formed in the Commonwealth, or any person or partnership not a resident thereof, shall obtain from a railroad, steamship, or steamboat company the right or privilege of carrying
articles upon the trains, steamships, or steamboats of such railroad, steamship, or steamboat company, such railroad, steamship, or steamboat company shall not in any manner be liable as a common carrier for any article thereafter
delivered to such corporation, company, association, person, or partnership for carriage as aforesaid.

History.
Code 1919, § 4031; 2014, c. 192.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 192 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth,” deleted “and shall comply with the provisions of §§ 56-266 to 56-269” preceding “such railroad,” and made a minor stylistic change.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
8A M.J. Express Companies, § 2.

§ 56-123.
Adjustment of claims against carriers.

Every claim against a common carrier doing business in the Commonwealth for loss or damage to property while in its possession, and every claim for storage, demurrage and car service against such carrier under the rules and regulations prescribed by the
State Corporation Commission, shall be adjusted and paid within 60 days in case of shipments wholly within the Commonwealth, and within 90 days in case of interstate shipment, and within 60 days in case of claims for demurrage or car
service after the filing of such claim with the agent of such carrier at the point of destination of such shipment or with the claims department of such common carrier. No such claims shall be filed until after the arrival of shipment
or some part thereof at the point of destination or until after the lapse of a reasonable time for the arrival thereof, when such claim is for loss or damage to freight. In every case such carrier shall be liable for the amount of
such loss or damage to freight, or such penalty as is prescribed for failure to comply with the rules and regulations of the Commission, relating to storage, demurrage, and car service, together with interest thereon from the date
of the filing of the claim therefor, until the payment thereof. Failure to adjust and pay such claim within the periods herein respectively prescribed shall subject such common carrier so failing to a penalty of $25 for each and every
such failure, to be recovered by such claimant so aggrieved in the same action or proceedings in any court having jurisdiction in the Commonwealth; provided, that unless such claimant recover in such action the full amount claimed
by him no penalty shall be recovered, but only the actual amount of the loss or damage to freight, or amount due for storage, demurrage or car service, with interest as aforesaid; and, provided further, that if in such action or proceedings
such claim shall be found to be fraudulent the claimant shall pay to the carrier a penalty of $25, to be recovered along with the costs. If after such periods above prescribed, the carrier shall voluntarily pay the full amount so claimed,
then such penalty alone may be recovered as aforesaid by the claimant.

History.
1918, p. 467; 1922, p. 420; Michie Code 1942, § 3928a; 2005, c. 839.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice in the first sentence; deleted “or before any trial justice” preceding “having jurisdiction” in the fourth sentence; and made stylistic
changes.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No.

1-206

Complaint Against Common Carrier — Injury to Passenger; No.

1-218

Answer of Common Carrier — Injury to Passenger; No.

1-506

Complaint by Seller Against Common Carrier — Damage to Goods.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 31, 74.

§ 56-124.
Procedure in action on such claims.

In any action which may be instituted pursuant to § 56-123 before a general district court for an amount not exceeding $300, either party at or before the return day of the warrant may, in lieu of or in addition to giving evidence at the hearing, file
an affidavit relating to the subject matter and in such case the other party to such action shall have a right to a continuance for a reasonable time; provided, that any party to such action may give reasonable notice to the party
filing such affidavit and take the deposition of the affiant, at such time and place as the court may prescribe, the taking of such deposition to be governed by the rules of law in force regarding the cross-examination of witnesses.
Such affidavits and depositions shall be read with the same force and effect as if taken in the form of a deposition after due notice to the other party. In the event of appeal of any such action such affidavits and depositions shall
be read in the appellate court with the same force and effect as before the general district court.

History.
1918, p. 467; 1922, p. 421; Michie Code 1942, § 3928b; 2005, c. 839.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “general district court” for “trial justice” in the first and last sentences.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No.

1-206

Complaint Against Common Carrier — Injury to Passenger; No.

1-218

Answer of Common Carrier — Injury to Passenger; No.

1-506

Complaint by Seller Against Common Carrier — Damage to Goods.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, § 74.

§ 56-125.
Suits against unincorporated carriers.

When transportation lines are owned or operated by persons, partnerships, or associations, not incorporated, any one or more of them may be sued by his or their name or names only, and such suit shall not abate for want of joining any of the copartners
or coproprietors.

History.
Code 1919, § 3931.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, § 74.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender), No.

1-506

Complaint by Seller Against Common Carrier — Damage to Goods.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, § 74.